New Jersey, session 221, S78.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    As used in this act: Documented victim of domestic violence means a victim of domestic violence as defined in section 3 of the "Prevention of Domestic Violence Act of 1991," P.L.1991, c.261 (C.2C:25-19) who (1) has obtained a permanent restraining order against a defendant pursuant to section 13 of the "Prevention of Domestic Violence Act of 1991," P.L.1991, c.261 (C.2C:25-29);  or (2) has obtained a statement from the office of the county prosecutor of the county where the domestic violence is alleged to have occurred that the victim is cooperating with law enforcement in any investigation or prosecution involving a domestic violence offense in which the person is the alleged victim whether or not a temporary or permanent restraining order or a criminal conviction has been obtained. Public institution of higher education means any public university, college, technical college or community college located in New Jersey. Tuition means the charges for one semester imposed by a New Jersey public institution of higher education or county vocational school providing post-secondary vocational education for enrollment at the institution or school. 2.    a.  The Higher Education Student Assistance Authority shall establish the Domestic Violence Tuition Waiver Program.  The purpose of the program is to provide State-paid tuition or a tuition waiver for one semester to persons who are victims of domestic violence and who, as a result of that victimization, were unable to complete a course of study at an institution of higher education or county vocational school post-secondary program in this State. b.    The State shall reimburse an institution of higher education or county vocational school for the tuition cost of each person who enrolls in the institution or school pursuant to the provisions of this act. 3.    a.  A person who meets the following requirements at the time of the initial application to the Higher Education Student Assistance Authority shall be eligible for the program: (1)   the person qualifies for admission to a New Jersey public institution of higher education or county vocational school post-secondary program; (2)   the person is a documented victim of domestic violence; (3)   the person was enrolled in a course of study in a New Jersey public institution of higher education or county vocational school post-secondary program at the time of occurrence of the act of domestic violence, was unable to complete the course of study because of that act, and submits an affidavit to that effect; (4)   no more than two years have passed since the act of domestic violence; and (5)   the person is seeking to reenroll in the same or substantially similar course of study. b.    A person who meets the eligibility requirements listed in this section may apply to the Higher Education Student Assistance Authority for a tuition waiver in a form and manner prescribed by the authority. c.     Upon receipt of an application, the Higher Education Student Assistance Authority shall review the application and, if the applicant meets the program eligibility requirements, approve the application and notify the appropriate New Jersey public institution of higher education or county vocational school that the person qualifies for a waiver of one semesters tuition for the course work left incomplete as a result of the incidence of domestic violence. d.    Eligibility for the program shall be limited to two years from the date the applicant is notified of acceptance by the Higher Education Student Assistance Authority for a tuition waiver pursuant to subsection b. of this section. e.     No applicant shall be granted more than one tuition waiver. 4.    Rules, regulations. Subject to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), the Higher Education Student Assistance Authority shall adopt rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this act. 5.    This act shall take effect immediately.